Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-639
Application for permit; contents; fee.

An applicant which desires to avail itself of the Municipal and Rural Domestic Ground Water Transfers Permit Act shall make application in writing to the Chief Water Officer for a permit. The application shall include (1) a statement of the amount of water for which a permit is desired together with an exhibit of maps showing the location of all water wells and (2) such other information as the Chief Water Officer deems necessary or desirable. The application shall be accompanied by a fee in the amount of fifty dollars for the first five million gallons per day and an additional twenty dollars for each additional increment of five million gallons per day requested. The fee shall be based on the amounts of water requested on a daily average basis.

Laws 1963, c. 276, § 2, p. 829;

Laws 1993, LB 131, § 19;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 178;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 179.

Preference in the use of ground water is given to domestic use. Metropolitan Utilities Dist. v. Merritt Beach Co., 179 Neb. 783, 140 N.W.2d 626 (1966).